apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="ped/ire__vblex">		<!-- paradigma M curretore ortogràficu: caso general -->
  <e>       <p><l>ire</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>int</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ias</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iat</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ìamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iamus</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e>       <p><l>iais</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iant</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ei</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eit</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>emus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eis</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eint</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ire</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ires</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iret</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iremus</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ireis</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irent</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amus</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>idu</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ida</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idos</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idas</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<e lm="achirire">        <p><l>achir</l>     <r>achirire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acumprire">       <p><l>acumpr</l>    <r>acumprire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afallire">        <p><l>afall</l>     <r>afallire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="allichidire">     <p><l>allichid</l>  <r>allichidire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aporrire">        <p><l>aporr</l>     <r>aporrire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arrustire">       <p><l>arrust</l>    <r>arrustire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="assubrire">       <p><l>assubr</l>    <r>assubrire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atibbire">        <p><l>atibb</l>     <r>atibbire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atullire">        <p><l>atull</l>     <r>atullire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atzutzuddire">    <p><l>atzutzudd</l> <r>atzutzuddire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bandire">         <p><l>band</l>      <r>bandire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="boddire">         <p><l>bodd</l>      <r>boddire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="candire">         <p><l>cand</l>      <r>candire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chimire">         <p><l>chim</l>      <r>chimire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chitire">         <p><l>chit</l>      <r>chitire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="colorire">        <p><l>color</l>     <r>colorire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conduire">        <p><l>condu</l>     <r>conduire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contzebire">      <p><l>contzeb</l>   <r>contzebire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cosire">          <p><l>cos</l>       <r>cosire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crompire">        <p><l>cromp</l>     <r>crompire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cumpartzire">     <p><l>cumpartz</l>  <r>cumpartzire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cunduire">        <p><l>cundu</l>     <r>cunduire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cuntzebire">      <p><l>cuntzeb</l>   <r>cuntzebire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="custoire">        <p><l>custo</l>     <r>custoire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="definire">        <p><l>defin</l>     <r>definire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dessinire">       <p><l>dessin</l>    <r>dessinire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diferire">        <p><l>difer</l>     <r>diferire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="diminuire">       <p><l>diminu</l>    <r>diminuire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="discinire">       <p><l>discin</l>    <r>discinire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dispedire">       <p><l>disped</l>    <r>dispedire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distruire">       <p><l>distru</l>    <r>distruire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dividire">        <p><l>divid</l>     <r>dividire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erbire">          <p><l>erb</l>       <r>erbire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esimire">         <p><l>esim</l>      <r>esimire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estremessire">    <p><l>estremess</l> <r>estremessire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fartzire">        <p><l>fartz</l>     <r>fartzire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="finire">          <p><l>fin</l>       <r>finire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frobire">         <p><l>frob</l>      <r>frobire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frunire">         <p><l>frun</l>      <r>frunire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fuire">           <p><l>fu</l>        <r>fuire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gestire">         <p><l>gest</l>      <r>gestire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grarire">         <p><l>grar</l>      <r>grarire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="illuire">         <p><l>illu</l>      <r>illuire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="impressire">      <p><l>impress</l>   <r>impressire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incluire">        <p><l>inclu</l>     <r>incluire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="infrorire">       <p><l>infror</l>    <r>infrorire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inserire">        <p><l>inser</l>     <r>inserire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="investire">       <p><l>invest</l>    <r>investire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscandire">       <p><l>iscand</l>    <r>iscandire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ischighitzire">   <p><l>ischighitz</l><r>ischighitzire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iscosire">        <p><l>iscos</l>     <r>iscosire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="isfaddire">       <p><l>isfadd</l>    <r>isfaddire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ismaltire">       <p><l>ismalt</l>    <r>ismaltire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ispedire">        <p><l>isped</l>     <r>ispedire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="issimire">        <p><l>issim</l>     <r>issimire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="istransire">      <p><l>istrans</l>   <r>istransire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="launire">         <p><l>laun</l>      <r>launire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="medire">          <p><l>med</l>       <r>medire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nisire">          <p><l>nis</l>       <r>nisire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ordire">          <p><l>ord</l>       <r>ordire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="percuisire">      <p><l>percuis</l>   <r>percuisire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pistiddire">      <p><l>pistidd</l>   <r>pistiddire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prighigionire">   <p><l>prighigion</l><r>prighigionire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pudire">          <p><l>pud</l>       <r>pudire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rebisalire">      <p><l>rebisal</l>   <r>rebisalire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="remenire">        <p><l>remen</l>     <r>remenire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retzire">         <p><l>retz</l>      <r>retzire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rifinire">        <p><l>rifin</l>     <r>rifinire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="salire">          <p><l>sal</l>       <r>salire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sirire">          <p><l>sir</l>       <r>sirire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sugerire">        <p><l>suger</l>     <r>sugerire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="surtzire">        <p><l>surtz</l>     <r>surtzire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tipilire">        <p><l>tipil</l>     <r>tipilire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trasmitire">      <p><l>trasmit</l>   <r>trasmitire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trontzire">       <p><l>trontz</l>    <r>trontzire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tzibire">         <p><l>tzib</l>      <r>tzibire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="usufruire">       <p><l>usufru</l>    <r>usufruire</r></p><par n="ped/ire__vblex"/></e>
